Maine, session 132, LD1888.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §5821, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 97, §3, is amended
to read:
10. Assets in sex trafficking offenses. All assets, including money instruments,
personal property and real property, used or intended for use in or traceable to an
aggravated sex trafficking offense as defined in Title 17‑A, section 852 or a sex trafficking
offense as defined in Title 17‑A, section 853; and
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §5821, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 97, §3, is amended
to read:
11. Assets in criminal forced labor offenses. All assets, including money
instruments, personal property and real property, used or intended for use in or traceable to
a criminal forced labor offense as defined in Title 17‑A, section 304 or an aggravated
criminal forced labor offense as defined in Title 17‑A, section 305.; and
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §5821, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Assets in racketeering offenses. All assets, including money instruments,
personal property and real property, used or intended for use in or traceable to a
racketeering offense as described in Title 17-A, section 1132.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA c. 46 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 46
RACKETEERING
§1131. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. "Criminal act" means conduct constituting any of the following crimes, or
conspiracy to commit or an attempt to commit any of the following Class A, B, C or D
crimes, under the following provisions:
A. Section 201, murder;
B. Section 283, dissemination of sexually explicit material;
Page 1 - 132LR1554(01)

C. Section 284, possession of sexually explicit material;
D. Section 301, kidnapping;
E. Section 304, criminal forced labor;
F. Section 305, aggravated criminal forced labor;
G. Section 353, theft by unauthorized taking or transfer;
H. Section 354, theft by deception;
I. Section 355, theft by extortion;
J. Section 357, theft of services;
K. Section 363, organized retail theft;
L. Section 401, burglary;
M. Section 602, bribery in official and political matters;
N. Section 651, robbery;
O. Section 702, aggravated forgery;
P. Section 703, forgery;
Q. Section 708, negotiating a worthless instrument;
R. Section 757, trafficking in prison contraband;
S. Section 802, arson;
T. Section 852, aggravated sex trafficking;
U. Section 853, sex trafficking;
V. Section 905-A, misuse of identification;
W. Section 905-C, misuse of public benefits instrument;
X. Section 953, aggravated unlawful gambling;
Y. Section 955, possession of gambling records;
Z. Section 956, possession of gambling devices;
AA. Section 1103, unlawful trafficking in scheduled drugs;
BB. Section 1104, trafficking in or furnishing counterfeit drugs;
CC. Section 1105-A, aggravated trafficking of scheduled drugs;
DD. Section 1105-B, aggravated trafficking or furnishing of counterfeit drugs;
EE. Section 1105-C, aggravated furnishing of scheduled drugs;
FF. Section 1105-D, aggravated cultivating of marijuana;
GG. Section 1106, unlawfully furnishing scheduled drugs;
HH. Section 1117, subsection 1, paragraph B, subparagraph (1) or (2), cultivating 100
or more marijuana plants; or
II. In the laws of this State relating to the taxation of alcoholic beverages, cigarettes,
gasoline or cannabis, any Class C or higher crime.
Page 2 - 132LR1554(01)

2. "Enterprise" means any entity, corporate or otherwise, public, private or
unregistered, engaged in business, commercial, professional, industrial, charitable, social,
political or governmental activity.
3. "Pattern of criminal activity" means conduct, engaged in by persons charged with
racketeering, constituting 2 or more criminal acts that:
A. Were committed within 3 years of the commencement of the criminal action that
includes the racketeering charge;
B. Are neither isolated incidents nor so closely related and connected in point of time
or circumstances of commission as to constitute a single criminal act, incident or
venture;
C. Are either:
(1) Related to one another through a common scheme or plan; or
(2) Were committed, solicited, requested, importuned or intentionally aided by
persons acting with the mental culpability required for the commission of those
acts and associated with or in the racketeering enterprise; and
D. Are not juvenile crimes, as defined in Title 15, section 3103.
4. "Racketeering enterprise" means a group of 3 or more persons sharing a common
purpose of engaging in criminal conduct, associated in an ascertainable structure distinct
from a pattern of criminal activity, and with a continuity of existence, structure and criminal
purpose beyond the scope of individual criminal incidents.
§1132. Racketeering
1. A person is guilty of racketeering if, having knowledge of the existence of a
racketeering enterprise and the nature of its activities, and being knowingly associated with
the racketeering enterprise, that person:
A. Intentionally or knowingly conducts or participates in the affairs of the racketeering
enterprise by participating in a pattern of criminal activity;
B. Intentionally acquires or maintains any interest in or control of the racketeering
enterprise by participating in a pattern of criminal activity; or
C. Participates in a pattern of criminal activity and knowingly invests any proceeds
derived from that conduct, or any proceeds derived from the investment or use of those
proceeds, in the racketeering enterprise.
2. For purposes of this section, a person participates in a pattern of criminal activity
when, with intent to participate in or advance the affairs of the racketeering enterprise, that
person engages in conduct constituting, or is criminally liable for the conduct of another
under section 57, at least 2 of the criminal acts included in the pattern if:
A. Both of the acts are Class D or higher crimes other than conspiracy; and
B. Both of the acts occurred within 3 years of the commencement of the criminal action
that includes the racketeering charge.
3. For purposes of this section, the enterprise associated with the racketeering
enterprise in violation of this section is not required to be the racketeering enterprise by
Page 3 - 132LR1554(01)

411 which the person is employed or with which that person is associated, and may be a
422 legitimate enterprise.
4. If the highest sentencing class of the criminal acts included in the pattern of criminal
activity is:
A. Class A or B, a violation of this section is a Class B crime; or
B. Class C or D, a violation of this section is a Class C crime.
§1133. Jurisdiction for racketeering prosecutions
1. In addition to the State's having jurisdiction pursuant to section 7 to convict a person
under section 1132, the State has jurisdiction to convict a person under this chapter if that
person is physically located outside of this State and the prohibited conduct:
A. Occurs outside of this State and the victim of the crime is a resident of this State at
the time of the crime; and
B. Is sufficient under this chapter to constitute a crime in this State.
2. As used in this section, "resident" means a person who lives in this State either
permanently or for an extended period. For purposes of this subsection, "extended period"
includes, but is not limited to, the period of time a student attends a school or college and
the period of time a person serving in the Armed Forces of the United States is stationed in
this State.
3. The crime of racketeering as described in section 1132 may be prosecuted and
punished in:
A. The county in which the defendant was located when the defendant committed one
or more of the criminal acts;
B. The county in which the victim of one or more of the criminal acts was located
when the act was committed; or
C. If the criminal acts are found to have occurred in one or more counties, the county
where the criminal act with the highest sentencing class occurred.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.